apertium-ita.ita.dix
<pardef n="/essere__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>saremmo</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarei</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sareste</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>saresti</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sarebber</l>  <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarebbero</l> <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarebbe</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>saremo</l>    <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarò</l>      <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarete</l>    <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarai</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>saran</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>saranno</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sarà</l>      <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essendo</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essendo</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fummo</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fui</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>foste</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fosti</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>furon</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>furono</l>    <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fu</l>        <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siamo</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siamo</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantiamo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siate</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siate</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sii</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sii</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sian</l>      <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siano</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sia</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esser</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>essere</l>    <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esser</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eravamo</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ero</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eravate</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eri</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eran</l>      <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erano</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>era</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fossimo</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fossi</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>foste</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fossi</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>fosser</l>    <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fossero</l>   <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fosse</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>state</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>state</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantate"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stata</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stata</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantata"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stati</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stati</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantati"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stato</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stato</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantato"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siamo</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sono</l>      <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siete</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sei</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>son</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sono</l>      <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>è</l>         <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siamo</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sia</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siate</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sia</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sian</l>      <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siano</l>     <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sia</l>       <r>essere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

    <e lm="essere"><par n="/essere__vblex"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="essere possibile"><i></i><par n="/essere__vblex"/><p><l><b/>possibile</l><r><g><b/>possibile</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="essere grato"><i></i><par n="/essere__vblex"/><p><l><b/>grato</l><r><g><b/>grato</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="essere carente">  <i></i><par n="/essere__vblex"/><p><l><b/>carente</l><r><g><b/>carente</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="essere imbranato"><i></i><par n="/essere__vblex"/><p><l><b/>imbranato</l><r><g><b/>imbranato</g></r></p></e>
